test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aki_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - аки: # Noun 122 'eng paternal uncle/est kahju/fin setä' - full paradigm
     аки+N+Sg+Nom: аки
     аки+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: аким
     аки+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: акин
     аки+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: акитэ
     аки+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom: акиме̄н
     аки+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom: акӣн
     аки+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom: акитэ̄н
     аки+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: акиюв
     аки+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: акин
     аки+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: акияныл
     аки+N+Du+Nom: акийыг
     аки+N+Pl+Nom: акит
#
     а̄ны+N+Sg+Nom: а̄ны
     а̄ны+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: а̄ным
     а̄ны+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: а̄нын
     а̄ны+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: а̄нытэ
     а̄ны+N+Du+Nom: а̄ныйыг
     а̄ны+N+Pl+Nom: а̄ныт


# (Скрибник & Афанасьева 2007: 78) 
     а̄ны+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: а̄ным
     а̄ны+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: а̄нын
     а̄ны+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: а̄нытэ
     а̄ны+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom: а̄ныме̄н
     а̄ны+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom: а̄ныйин
     а̄ны+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom: а̄нытэ̄н
     а̄ны+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: а̄ныюв
     а̄ны+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: а̄нын
     а̄ны+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: а̄ныяныл

     а̄ны+N+Du+PxSg1+Nom: а̄ныягум
     а̄ны+N+Du+PxSg2+Nom: а̄ныягын
     а̄ны+N+Du+PxSg3+Nom: а̄ныяге
     а̄ны+N+Du+PxDu1+Nom: а̄ныягме̄н
     а̄ны+N+Du+PxDu2+Nom: а̄ныягы̄н
     а̄ны+N+Du+PxDu3+Nom: а̄ныяге̄н
     а̄ны+N+Du+PxPl1+Nom: а̄ныягув
     а̄ны+N+Du+PxPl2+Nom: а̄ныягы̄н
     а̄ны+N+Du+PxPl3+Nom: а̄ныяганыл

     а̄ны+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: а̄ныянум
     а̄ны+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: а̄ныянын
     а̄ны+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: а̄ныянэ
     а̄ны+N+Pl+PxDu1+Nom: а̄ныянме̄н
     а̄ны+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom: а̄ныяны̄н
     а̄ны+N+Pl+PxDu3+Nom: а̄ныянэ̄н
     а̄ны+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: а̄ныянув
     а̄ны+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: а̄ныяны̄н
     а̄ны+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: а̄ныянаныл
